Franklin Roosevelt inaugurated; New Deal begins (see Chapter 24)
....1935
American Communist Party proclaims Popular Front
1930
Tariff Act of 1930
Ten-year drought begins in South and Midwest (the Dust Bowl)
1932
Reconstruction Finance Corporation established
Bonus marchers come to Washington, D.C.
Franklin D. Roosevelt elected president
Banking crisis begins
1934
Southern Tenant Farmers' Union organized
1936
Margaret Mitchell publishes Gone with the Wind
Life magazine begins publication
1939
John Steinbeck publishes The Grapes of Wrath Nazi-Soviet Pact weakens American Communist Party
1941
James Agee and Walker Evans publish Let Us Now Praise Famous Men
1940
Richard Wright publishes Native Son
Ernest Hemingway publishes For Whom the Bell Tolls
THE NEW DEAL
TVA JOBS ARE WAR JOBS
The Tennessee Valley Authority, a federally owned corporation, sought to revitalize a region devastated by depression and other catastrophes. By the time of World War II, much of the work of the TVA centered on producing hydroelectric power with which to build war materiel. {© war posters/Alamy) NO TANK
NO SHELL
NO PLANE
CAN EE MAM WITHOUT IT

m jobs ,
M*g WAR JQgJJ
LOOKING AHEAD
1.	What emergency measures did FDR take in his first hundred days as president?
2.	Who were the major critics of FDR's New Deal, and how did their criticisms influence FDR's "Second New Deal"?
3.	What were the principal achievements of the "Second New Deal" in 1945?
SETTING THE STAGE
THE ADMINISTRATION
of Franklin Roosevelt was in many ways the most politically successful presidency in American history, Roosevelt won four successive terms in office, and his administration constructed a series of programs that permanently altered the shape of the federal government and its relationship to society, By the end of the 1930s, the New Deal (as the Roosevelt program was called) had created many of the broad outlines of the political world we know today. It had created a powerful coalition within the Democratic Party that would dominate American politics for most of the next thirty years, and it had produced the beginnings of a new liberal ideology that would govern reform efforts for decades.
One thing the New Deal had not done, however, was end the Great Depression. At the end of 1940, near the end of Roosevelt's second term, many of the basic problems of the Depression remained unsolved. The persistence of the Depression created many challenges to the New Deal. Dissident groups on both the right and the left—some of them of considerable size and strength—mobilized outside the conventional party system to promote alternative paths to recovery. Factions within the Democratic Party, most notably southern conservatives, turned against Roosevelt's policies, joined with Republicans, and helped create a conservative coalition in Congress that frustrated many of his goals. Only the advent of World War II in 1940 and 1941 succeeded in ending the Great Depression. It also brought to a close most of the domestic initiatives of the New Deal.
LAUNCHING THE NEW DEAL
Roosevelt’s first task upon taking office was to alleviate the panic that was threatening the financial system. He did so in part by force of personality and in part by constructing very rapidly an ambitious and diverse program of legislation.
Restoring Confidence
Much of Roosevelt’s success was a result of his ebullient personality. In his inaugural address, he assured the American people that "the only thing we have to fear is fear itself,” and promised to Roosevelt’s take drastic’ even warlike> action against the emergency. He projected an infec-Personality tious optimism that helped alleviate the growing despair. He was the first president to make regular use of the radio, and his friendly "fireside chats,” during which he explained his programs and plans to the people, helped build public confidence in the administration. Roosevelt held frequent informal press conferences and won the respect and friendship of most reporters. Their regard for him was such that by unwritten agreement, no journalist ever photographed the president getting into or out of his car or sitting in his wheelchair.
Much of the American public remained unaware throughout the Roosevelt years that the president’s legs were completely paralyzed.
But Roosevelt could not rely on image alone. On March 6, 1933, two days after taking office, he issued a proclamation closing all American banks for four days until Congress could meet in special session to consider banking-reform legislation. So great was the panic about bank failures that the "bank holiday,” as the president euphemistically described it, created a general sense of relief. Three "Bank	days later’ Roosevelt sent to Congress the Emergency Banking Act, a generally
Holiday”	conservative bill (much of it drafted by Hoover administration holdovers)
designed primarily to protect the larger banks from being dragged down by the weakness of smaller ones. The bill provided for Treasury Department inspection of all banks before they would be allowed to reopen, for federal assistance to some troubled institutions and for a thorough reorganization of those in the greatest difficulty. A confused and frightened Congress passed the bill within four hours of its introduction. "I can assure you,” Roosevelt told the public on March i2, in his first fireside chat, "that it is safer to keep your money in a reopened bank than under the mattress. Whatever else the new law accomplished, it helped dispel the panic Three-quarters of the banks in the Federal Reserve system reopened within the next three days' and $ billion in
662
THE NEW DEAL 663
THE “RADIO PRESIDENT”
Franklin D. Roosevelt was the first American president to master the use of radio. Beginning in his first days in office, he regularly bypassed the newspapers and communicated directly with the people through his famous "fireside chats." He is shown here speaking in 1938, urging communities to continue to provide work relief for the unemployed. {L' Bettmann/Corbis) hoarded currency and gold flowed back into them within a month. The immediate banking crisis was over.
On the morning after passage of the Emergency Banking Act, Roosevelt sent to Congress another measure-the Economy Act-designed to convince fiscally conservative Americans (especially the business community) that the federal government was in safe, responsible hands. The act proposed to balance the federal budget by cutting the salaries of government employees and reducing pensions to veterans by as much as 15 percent. Otherwise, the president warned, the nation faced a $ 1 billion budget deficit. Like the banking bill, this one passed Congress almost instantly-despite heated protests from some congressional progressives.
Roosevelt also moved in his first days in office to put to rest one of the divisive issues of the 1920s. He supported and then signed a bill to legalize the manufacture and sale of beer with r>	a 3.2 percent alcohol content-an interim
Repealed measure pending the repeal of prohibition, for which a constitutional amendment (the
Twenty-First) was already in process. The amendment was ratified later in 1933.
Agricultural Adjustment
These initial actions were largely stopgaps, to buy time for comprehensive programs. The first of them was the Agricultural Adjustment Act, which Congress passed in May 1933. Its most important feature was its provision for reducing crop production to end agricultural surpluses and halt the downward spiral of farm prices.
Under the provisions of the act, producers of seven basic
commodities (wheat, cotton, corn, hogs, rice, tobacco, and dairy
Products) would decide on production limits for their crops.
AAA
The government, through the Agricultural Adjustment Administration (AAA), would then tell individual farmers how much they should produce and would pay them subsidies for leaving some of their land idle. A tax on food processing (for example, the milling of wheat) would provide the funds for the new payments. Farm prices would be subsidized up to the point of parity.
The AAA helped bring about a rise in prices for farm commodities in the years after 1933. Gross farm income increased by half in the first three years of the New Deal, and the agricultural economy emerged from the 1930s much more stable and prosperous than it had been in many years. The AAA did, however, favor larger farmers over smaller ones, particularly since local administration of its programs often fell into the hands of the most powerful producers in a community. By distributing payments to landowners, not those who worked the land, the government did little to discourage planters who were reducing their acreage from evicting tenants and sharecroppers and firing field hands.
In January 1936, the Supreme Court struck down the crucial provisions of the Agricultural Adjustment Act, arguing that the government had no constitutional authority to require farmers to limit production. But within a few weeks the administration had secured passage of new legislation (the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act), which permitted the government to pay farmers to reduce production so as to "conserve soil,” prevent erosion, and accomplish other secondary goals. The Court did not interfere with the new laws.
The administration launched several efforts to assist poor farmers as well. The Resettlement Administration, established in 1935, and its successor, the Farm Security Administration, created in 1937, provided loans to help farmers cultivating submarginal soil to relocate to better lands. But the programs never moved more than a few thousand farmers. More effective was the Rural Electrification Administration, created in
1935, which worked to make electric power available for the first time to thousands of farmers through utility cooperatives.
Industrial Recovery
Ever since 1931, leaders of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce and many others had been urging the government to adopt an antideflation scheme that would permit trade associations to cooperate in stabilizing prices within their industries. Existing antitrust laws clearly forbade such practices, and Herbert Hoover had refused to endorse suspension of the laws. The Roosevelt administration was more receptive. In exchange for relaxing antitrust provisions, however, New Dealers insisted on other provisions. Business leaders would have to make important concessions to labor-recognize the workers’ right to bargain collectively through unions-to ensure that the incomes of workers would rise along with prices. And to help create jobs and increase consumer buying power, the administration added a major program of public works spending. The result of these and many other impulses
"Rural
Electrification”
BANKING CRISES
WHEN FRANKLIN DELANO ROOSEVELT TOOK OFFICE AS PRESIDENT IN 1933,
the U.S. banking system was close to collapse. As depositors, panicked by the worsening Depression, withdrew their savings from the banks, bank after bank was forced to close. To prevent a complete collapse of the banking system, FDR first declared a bank holiday/' calling for the closing of all banks, and then called Congress into special session to pass banking-reform legislation, the Emergency Banking Act. In his first fireside chat on March 12, 1933-excerpted in the first source document below-the president sought to explain to the public the actions he and Congress had undertaken and to reassure his listeners that their money would be safe in banks. Some seventy-five years after the Great Depression of the 1930s, the nation once again experienced a serious financial crisis in the Great Recession of 2007-2010. Once again, Congress passed banking-reform legislation calling for closer regulation of banks and providing greater protections for consumers. In his address of July 21, 2010, President Barack Obama outlined the provisions of the new legislation and sought to reassure the public. Excerpts from this address comprise the second source in this feature.
THE GREAT DEPRESSION-1933
Franklin Delano Roosevelt: "The Banking Crisis (First Fireside Chat)”
First of all, let me state the simple fact that when you deposit money in a bank, the bank does not put the money into a safe deposit vault. It invests your money in many different forms of credit in bonds, in commercial paper, in mortgages and in many other kinds of loans. In other words, the bank puts your money to work to keep the wheels of industry and of agriculture turning around. ...
What, then, happened during the last few days of February and the first few days of March? Because of undermined confidence on the part of the public, there was a general rush by a large portion of our population to turn bank deposits into currency or gold, a rush so great that the soundest banks couldn't get enough currency to meet the demand. ... By the afternoon of March third, a week ago last Friday, scarcely a bank in the country was open to do business. Proclamations closing them, in whole or in part, had been issued by the Governors in almost all the states. It was then that I issued the proclamation providing for the national bank holiday, and this was the first step in the Government’s reconstruction of our financial and economic fabric.
The second step, last Thursday, was the legislation promptly and patriotically passed by the Congress confirming my proclamation and broadening my powers so that it became possible in view of the requirement of time to extend the holiday and lift the ban of that holiday gradually in the days to come. This law also gave authority to develop a program of rehabilitation of our banking facilities. . . .
The new law allows the twelve Federal Reserve Banks to issue additional currency on good assets and thus the banks that reopen will be able to meet every legitimate call.... It is necessary that the reopening of banks be extended over a period [of several days] in order to permit the banks to make applications for the necessary loans, to obtain currency needed to meet their requirements, and to enable the Government to make common sense checkups
We have had a bad banking situation. Some of our bankers had shown themselves either incompetent or dishonest in their handling of the people’s funds. They had used the money entrusted to them in speculations and unwise loans This was, of course, not true in the vast majority of our banks, but it was true in enough of them to shock the people of the United States, for a time, into a sense of insecurity and to put them into a frame of mind where they did not differentiate
but seemed to assume that the acts of a comparative few had tainted them all And	,
• i	t	, j .	. , ,	. .	, ,	'	u oecame the Government’s iob to
straighten out this situation and do it as quickly as possible. And that job is being performed
664 *
ere is n ement m t e rea justment of our financial system more important than currency, more important than g° ’ an 1 3 JS 1 6 C°^ enCe	PeoPle themselves. Confidence and courage are the essentials of success in carrying
out our p an. ou peop e must have faith; you must not be stampeded by rumors or guesses. Let us unite in banishing ear. e ave provi e t e machinery to restore our financial system, and it is up to you to support and make it work. Source: whitehouse.c-span.org
.>
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
THE GREAT RECESSION OF 2007-2010
How does President Roosevelt explain the current economic crisis? What group does he single out as being most to blame? What tone does President Roosevelt use in addressing the public? What specific actions does he ask of the American public?
Barack Obama: Signing of Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform
and Consumer Protection Act
Over the past two years, we have faced the worst recession since the Great Depression. Eight million people lost their jobs. Tens of millions saw the value of their homes and retirement savings plummet. Countless businesses have been unable to get the loans they need and many have been forced to shut their doors. And although the economy is growing again, too many people are still feeling the pain of the downturn.
Now, while a number of factors led to such a severe recession, the primary cause was a breakdown in our financial system. It was a crisis born of a failure of responsibility from certain corners of Wall Street to the halls of power in Washington. For years, our financial sector was governed by antiquated and poorly enforced rules that allowed some to game the system and take risks that endangered the entire economy.
Unscrupulous lenders locked consumers into complex loans with hidden costs. Firms like AIG placed massive, risky bets with borrowed money. And while the rules left abuse and excess unchecked, they also left taxpayers on the hook if a big bank or financial institution ever failed.
Now, let’s put this in perspective. The fact is, the financial industry is central to our nation’s ability to grow, to prosper, to compete and to innovate. There are a lot of banks that understand and fulfill this vital role, and there are a whole lot of bankers who want to do right-and do right-by their customers. This reform will help foster innovation, not hamper it. It is designed to make sure that everybody follows the same set of rules, so that firms compete on price and quality, not on tricks and not on traps....
[Rjeform will also rein in the abuse and excess that nearly brought down our financial system. It will finally bring transparency to the kinds of complex and risky transactions that helped trigger the financial crisis. Shareholders will also have a greater say on the pay of CEOs and other executives, so they can reward success instead of failure.
And finally, because of this law, the American people will never again be asked to foot the bill for Wall Street’s mistakes. There will be no more tax-funded bailouts-period. If a large financial institution should ever fail, this reform gives us the ability to wind it down without endangering the broader economy. And there will be new rules to make clear that
no firm is somehow protected because it is "too big to fail.” .. .
The fact is every American-from Main Street to Wall Street-has a stake in our financial system. Wall Street banks and firms invest the capital that makes it possible for start-ups to sell new products. They provide loans to businesses to expand and to hire. They back mortgages for families purchasing a new home. That’s why we’ll all stand to gain from these reforms. We all win when investors around the world have confidence in our markets. We all win when shareholders have more power and more information. We all win when consumers are protected against abuse. And we all win when folks are rewarded based on how well they perform, not how well they evade accountability.
Source: www.whitehouse.gov
make connections
1.	What specifics does Obama offer in his explanation of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act? Why do you thin!
Obama's explanation is more detailed than FDR s?	.	,	... ,-rr 9
2.	Both presidents appealed to the public to support the new legislation. How do their appeals to he public differ.
3.	Wbtcb ZTe fS "r Obama s, do you "hink offers greater reassurance to the public’ Why is that message more reassunag?
666 ‘ CHAPTER 24
SALUTING THE BLUE EAGLE
Several thousand San Francisco schoolchildren assembled on a baseball field in 1933 to form the symbol of the National Recovery Administration: an eagle clutching a cogwheel (to symbolize industry) and a thunderbolt (to symbolize energy). This display is evidence of the widespread (if brief) popular enthusiasm the NRA produced. NRA administrators drew from their memories of World War I Liberty Loan drives and tried to establish the Blue Eagle as a symbol of patriotic commitment to recovery. (© Bettmann/Corbis) NRA
was the National Industrial Recovery Act, which Congress passed in June 1933.
At first, the new industrial recovery program appeared to work well. At its center was a new federal agency, the National Recovery Administration (NRA), under the direction of the flamboyant and energetic Hugh S. Johnson. Johnson called on every business establishment in the nation to
accept a temporary "blanket code”: a minimum wage of between 30 and 40 cents an hour, a maximum workweek of thirty-five to forty hours, and the abolition of child labor. Adherence to the code, he claimed, would raise consumer purchasing power and increase employment. At the same time, Johnson negotiated another, more specific set of codes with leaders of the nation's major industries. These industrial codes set floors below which no company would lower prices or wages in its search for a competitive advantage. He quickly won agreements from almost every major industry in the country.
From the beginning, however, the NRA encountered serious difficulties. The codes themselves were hastily and often poorly written. Administering them was beyond the capacities of federal officials with no prior experience in running so vast a program. Large producers consistently dominated the code-writing process and ensured that the new regulations would work to their advantage and to the disadvantage of smaller firms. And the codes at times did more than simply set floors under prices; they actively and artificially raised them-sometimes to levels higher than the market could sustain.
Other NRA goals did not progress as quickly as the efforts to raise prices. Section 7(a) of the National Industrial Recovery
Section 7(a) Act Promised workers the right to form •••....•..•.mm.hi......,,unions and engage in collective bargaining
and encouraged many workers to join unions for the first time.
But Section 7(a) contained no enforcement mechanisms. Hence recognition of unions by employers (and thus the significant wage increases the unions were committed to winning) did not follow. The Public Works Administration (PWA), established in 1933 to administer the National Industrial Recovery Act’s spending programs, only gradually allowed the $3.3 billion in public works funds to trickle out. Not until 1938 was the PWA budget pumping an appreciable amount of money into the economy.
Perhaps the clearest evidence of the NRA’s failure was that industrial production actually declined in the months after the agency’s establishment-from an index of 101 in July 1933 to 71 in November-despite the rise in prices that the codes had helped to create. By the spring of 1934, the NRA was besieged by criticism, and businessmen were ignoring many of its provisions. That fall, Roosevelt pressured Johnson to resign and established a new board of directors to oversee the NRA. Then, the Supreme Court intervened.
In 1935, a case came before the Court involving alleged NRA code violations by the Schechter brothers, who operated a wholesale poultry business confined to Brooklyn, New York. The Court ruled unanimously that the Schechters were not engaged in interstate commerce (and thus not subject to federal regulation) and, further, that Congress had unconstitutionally delegated legislative power to the president to draft the NRA codes. The justices struck down the legislation establishing the agency. Roosevelt denounced the justices for their whorse-and-buggy” interpretation of the interstate commerce clause. He was rightly concerned, for the reasoning in the Schechter case threatened many other New Deal programs as well. But the Court’s destruction of the NRA itself gave the New Deal a convenient excuse for ending a failed experiment.
THE NEW DEAL
• 667 ,-3y
TENNI=SS£E
X
Wilson MM MISSISSIPPI^	‘HUntfle
V
Decatur. f -''A A
y	A(|untersvi!Ie
ALABAMA
"WKENTUCKY J
'p	>
Bowling
W. VIRGINIA
..r./VfRP4N'fXy
LAp <r\
V
Johnson• ^XV --x	-1	11	ri+w	**
— x,.^ Oakx<	.<t
RidaeTZk^L
^dK™S rV’ x 7<heroke&x y
.yJ Atbrt Loudoun 6^ -/ ttli	\Cheoah
V
Calderwood X ^®nta^jj Chttkamauga^'^'^ -lx'wassee "^^^ftjenville Chatta^^	(,
Holston \vat&uga a
NORTH S, } CAROLINA
\Asheville
rA ’	''
\ SOUTn '? iCARCXjNA
Tennessee River watershed		Power plant
TVA dam project		Chemical plant



- - /
-
THE TENNESSEE VALLEY AUTHORITY
The Tennessee Valley Authority was one of the largest experiments in government-funded public works and regional planning in American history to that point. The federal government had helped fund many projects in its history—canals, turnpikes, railroads, bridges, dams, and others. But never before had it undertaken a project of such great scope, and never before had it maintained such close control and ownership over the public works it helped create. This map illustrates the broad reach of the TVA within the Tennessee Valley region, which spanned seven states. TVA dams throughout the region helped control floods and also provided a source for hydroelectric power, which the government sold to consumers. Note the dam near Muscle Shoals, Alabama, in the bottom left of the map. It was begun during World War I, and efforts to revive it in the 1920s helped create the momentum that produced the TVA. IV/jy were progressives so eager to see the government enter the business of hydroelectric power in the 1920s?
Regional Planning
The AAA and the NRA largely reflected the beliefs of New Dealers who favored economic planning but wanted private interests (farmers or business leaders) to dominate the planning process. Other reformers believed that the government itself should be the chief planning agent in the economy. Their most conspicuous success, and one of the most celebrated accomplishments of the New Deal, was an unprecedented experiment in regional planning: the Tennessee Valley Authority (TVA).
The TVA had its roots in a political controversy of the 1920s. Progressive reformers had agitated for years for public PYA	development of the nation's water resources
as a source of cheap electric power. In particular, they had urged completion of a great dam at Muscle Shoals on the Tennessee River in Alabama-a dam begun during World War I and left unfinished when the war ended. But °pposition from the utility companies had been too powerful
to overcome.
In 1932, however, one of the great utility empires-that of
the electricity magnate Samuel Insull-collapsed spectacu-
^rly, amid widely publicized exposes of corruption. Hostility
to the utilities soon grew so intense that the companies were no longer able to block the public power movement. The result in May 1933 was the Tennessee Valley Authority. The TVA was authorized to complete the dam at Muscle Shoals and build others in the region, and to generate and sell electricity from them to the public at reasonable rates. It was also intended to be an agent for a comprehensive redevelopment of the entire region: for stopping the disastrous flooding that had plagued the Tennessee Valley for centuries, for encouraging the development of local industries, for supervising a substantial program of reforestation, and for helping farmers improve productivity.
The TVA revitalized the region in numerous ways. It improved water transportation, virtually eliminated flooding in the region, and provided electricity to thousands who had never before had it. Throughout much of the country, largely because of the "yardstick” provided by the TVA’s cheap production of electricity, private power rates declined. Even so, the Tennessee Valley remained a generally impoverished region despite the TVA’s efforts. And like many other New Deal programs, the TVA made no serious effort to challenge local customs and racial prejudices.
668 • CHAPTER 24
Currency, Banks, and the Stock Market
Roosevelt soon came to consider the gold standard a major obstacle to the restoration of adequate prices. On April 18, 1933, he made the shift off the gold standard official with an executive order. By itself, the repudiation of the gold standard meant relatively little. But both before and after the April decision, the administration experimented in various ways with manipulating the value of the dollar-by making substantial purchases of gold and silver and later by establishing a new, fixed standard for the dollar (reducing its gold content substantially from the 1932 amount). The resort to government-managed currency-that is, to a dollar whose value could be raised or lowered by government policy according to economic circumstances-created an important precedent for future federal policies and permanently altered the relationship between the public and private sectors. It did not, however, have any immediate impact on the depressed American economy.
PUBLIC WORKS
Among the most visible products of the New Deal was a vast network of public works in almost all areas of the country, but concentrated particularly in the South and the West. The great dams that the government built in the Tennessee Valley and elsewhere were particularly effective at capturing the public imagination. This dramatic photograph by Margaret Bourke-White appeared on the cover of the first issue of Life in 1936, which very quickly became the most popular and successful magazine in America. It shows the Fort Peck Dam on the Missouri River. (Margaret Bourke White/© Time & Life Pictures/Getty Images) Through other legislation, the early New Deal increased federal authority over previously unregulated or weakly regulated areas of the economy. The Glass-Steagall
Steauall Act Act of June 1933 gave the government authority to curb irresponsible speculation by banks. It also established a wall between commercial banking and investment banking. Equally important, it established the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, which guaranteed all bank deposits up to $2,500. Finally, in 1935, Congress passed a major banking act that transferred much of the authority once wielded by the regional Federal Reserve banks to the
Federal Reserve Board in Washington.
To protect investors in the stock market, Congress passed
the so-called Truth in Securities Act of 1933, requiring corporations issuing new securities to provide full and accurate information about them to the public. Another act of June 1934
SEC	established the Securities and Exchange
Commission (SEC) to police the stock market. Among other things, the establishment of the SEC was an indication of how far the financial establishment had fallen in public estimation. The criminal trials of a number of once-respected Wall Street figures for grand larceny and fraud eroded
the public stature of the financial community still further.
The Growth of Federal Relief
Among Roosevelt's first acts in office was the establishment of the Federal Emergency Relief Administration (FERA), which provided cash grants to states to prop up bankrupt relief agencies. To administer the program, he chose the director of the New York State relief agency, Harry Hopkins, who disbursed the FERA grants widely and rapidly. But both Hopkins and Roosevelt had misgivings about establishing a government "dole.”
They felt more comfortable with another form of government assistance: work relief. Thus, when it became clear that the FERA grants were not enough, the administration established a second program: the Civil Works Administration CWA	(CWA). Between November 1933 and
April 1934, it put more than 4 million people to work on temporary projects. Some of the projects were of lasting value, such as the construction of roads, schools, and parks; others were little more than make-work. To Hopkins, however, the important thing was pumping money into an economy badly in need of it and providing assistance to people with nowhere else to turn.
Roosevelt’s favorite relief project was the Civilian Conservation Corps (CCC). Established in the first weeks of the new administration, the CCC was designed to provide employ-CCC	ment to the millions of young men who
could find no jobs in the cities. The CCC created camps in national parks and forests and in other rural and wilderness settings. There young men (women were argely excluded from the program) worked in a semimilitary environment on such projects as planting trees, building reservoirs, developing parks, and improving agricultural irrigation. CCC camps were segregated by race. The vast majority of
THE NEW DEAL > 669
them were restricted to white men, but a few were available
to African Americans, Mexicans, and Indians.
Mortgage relief was a pressing need for millions of farm owners and homeowners. The Farm Credit Administration, which within two years refinanced one-fifth of all farm mortgages in the United States, was one response to that problem. The Frazier-Lemke Farm Bankruptcy Act of 1933 was another. It enabled some farmers to regain their land even after foreclosure on their mortgages. Despite such efforts, however, 25 percent of all American farm owners had lost their land by 1934. Homeowners were similarly troubled, and in June 1933 the administration established the Home Owners Loan Corporation, which by 1936 had refinanced the mortgages of more than 1 million householders. A year later, Congress established the Federal Housing Administration to insure mortgages for new construction and home repairs.
THE NEW DEAL IN TRANSITION
Seldom has an American president enjoyed such remarkable popularity as Franklin Roosevelt did during his first two years in office. But with no end to the Depression yet in sight, the New Deal gradually found itself the target of fierce public criticism. In the spring of 1935, partly in response to these growing attacks, Roosevelt launched an ambitious new program of legislation that has often been called the "Second New Deal.”
Critics of the New Deal
>ome of the most strident attacks on the New Deal 'ame from critics on the right. Roosevelt had tried for i time to conciliate conservatives and business leaders. By the end of 1934, however, it was clear that the American right in general, and
American
Liberty
League
much of the corporate world in particular, had become irreconcilably hostile to the New Deal. In August
1934, a group of the most fervent (and wealthiest) Roosevelt opponents, led by members of the Du Pont family, reshaped the American Liberty League (formed initially to oppose prohibition of liquor), to arouse pub-Hc opposition to the New Deal’s "dictatorial” policies and its supposed attacks on free enterprise. But the new organization was never able to expand its constituency much beyond the northern industrialists who had founded it.
Roosevelt’s critics on the far left also managed to produce alarm among some supporters of the administration, but like the conservatives, they proved to have only limited strength. The Communist Party, the Socialist Party, and other radical and semiradical organizations were at times harshly critical of the New Deal. But they, too, failed to attract genuine mass support.
More menacing to the New Deal than either the far right or the far left was a group of dissident political movements that defied easy ideological classification. Some gained substantial public support within particular states and regions. And three men succeeded in mobilizing genuinely national followings. Dr. Francis E. Townsend, an elderly California physician, rose from obscurity to lead a movement of more than 5 million members with his plan for federal pensions for the elderly. According to the Townsend Plan, all Americans over the age of sixty would receive monthly government pensions of $200, provided they retired (thus freeing jobs for younger, unemployed Americans) and spent the money in full each month Townsend (which would pump needed funds into the Plan	economy). By 1935, the Townsend Plan
had attracted the support of many older men and women. And while the plan itself was defeated in Congress in 1935, the public sentiment behind it helped build support for the Social Security system, which Congress did
approve in 1935.
Father Charles E. Coughlin, a Catholic priest in the Detroit suburb of Royal Oak, Michigan, achieved even greater renown through his weekly sermons, launched in 1926 and broadcast nationally over the radio. In later years, Coughlin became notorious for his sympathy for fascism and his outspoken anti-Semitism. But until at least 1937, he was known primarily as an advocate for changing the banking and currency systems. He proposed a series of monetary reforms-remonetization of silver, issuing of greenbacks, and nationalization of the banking system-that he insisted would restore prosperity and ensure economic justice. At first a warm supporter of Franklin Roosevelt, by late 1934 Coughlin had become disheartened by
THE NEW DEAL
Of the many resources at Roosevelt's disposal was the impression of his sunny personality during dark times. It conveyed to many a sense of hope and optimism. In this political cartoon from about 1934, Roosevelt is seen steering the ship of state towards economic recovery. His detractors are shown grumbl.ng under the cloud of depression. (© The Granger Collection, New York) 670 * CHAPTER 24
Huey Long
what he claimed was the president’s failure to deal harshly
enough with the "money powers.” In the spring of 1935, he
established his own political organization, the National Union
for Social Justice. He was widely believed to have one of the
largest regular radio audiences of anyone in America.
More alarming to the administration was the growing national popularity of Senator Huey P. Long of Louisiana. Long had risen to power in his home state through his strident attacks on the banks, oil companies, and utilities and on the conservative political oligarchy allied with them. Elected governor in 1928, he launched an assault on his opponents so thorough and forceful
that they were soon left with virtually no political power. Many critics in Louisiana claimed that Long had, in effect, become a dictator. But he also maintained the overwhelming support of the Louisiana electorate, in part because of his flamboyant personality and in part because of his solid record of conventional progressive accomplishments: building roads, schools, and hospitals; revising the tax codes; distributing free textbooks; lowering utility rates. Barred by law from succeeding himself as governor, he ran in 1930 for a seat in the U.S. Senate and won easily.
Long, like Coughlin, supported Franklin Roosevelt in 1932. But within six months of Roosevelt’s inauguration, he had broken with the president. As an alternative to the New Deal, he advocated a drastic program of wealth redistribution, a program he ultimately named the Share-Our-Wealth Plan. The government, he claimed, could end the Depression easily by using the tax system to confiscate the surplus riches of the wealthiest men and women in America and distribute these surpluses to the rest of the population. That would, he claimed, allow the government to guarantee every family a minimum "homestead” of $5,000 and an annual wage of $2,500. In 1934, Long established his own national organization: the Share-Our-Wealth Society, which soon attracted a large following through much of the nation. A poll by the Democratic National Committee in the spring of 1935 disclosed that Long might attract more than 10 per-
cent of the vote if he ran as a third-party candidate, possibly enough to tip a close election to the Republicans.
Share-
Our-Wealth
Society
The "Second New Deal”
Roosevelt launched the so-called Second New Deal in the spring of 1935 in response both to the growing political pressures and to the continuing economic crisis. The new proposals represented, if not a new direction, at least a shift in the emphasis of New Deal policy. Perhaps the most conspicuous change was in the administration’s attitude toward big business. Symbolically at least, the president was now willing to attack corporate interests openly. In March, for example, he proposed to Congress an act designed to break up the great utility holding companies, and he spoke harshly of monopolistic control of their industry. The Holding Company Act of 1935 was the result, although furious lobbying by the utilities led to amendments that sharply limited its effects.
HUEY LONG
Few public speakers could arouse a crowd more effectively than Huey Long of Louisiana, known to many as "the Kingfish" (a nickname borrowed from the popular radio show Amos 'n Andy). It was Long’s effective use of radio, however, that contributed most directly to his spreading national popularity in the early 1930s. (© Archive Photos/Getty Images) Equally alarming to affluent Americans was a series of tax reforms proposed by the president in 1935, a program conservatives quickly labeled a "soak-the-rich” scheme. Apparently designed to undercut the appeal of Huey Long’s Share-Our-Wealth Plan, the Roosevelt proposals called for establishing the highest and most progressive peacetime tax rates in history-although the actual impact of these rates was limited.
me supreme Court decision in 1935 to strike
National
Labor
Relations
Board
National Industrial Recovery Act also invalidated Section 7(a) of the act, which had guaranteed workers the right to organize and bargain collectively. A group of progressives in Congress led by Senator Robert F. Wagner of New York introduced what became the National Labor Relations Act of 1935. The new law, popularly
known as the Wagner Act, provided workers with a crucial enforcement mechanism missing from the 1933 law: the National Labor Relations Board (NLRB), which would have power to compel employers to recognize and bargain with legitimate unions. The president was not entirely happy with the bill, but he signed it anyway. That was in large part because American workers themselves had by 1935 become so important and vigorous a force that Roosevelt realized his own political future would depend in part on responding to their demands.
THE NEW DEAL 671
Labor Militancy
The emergence of a powerful trade union movement in the
1930s was one of the most important social and political developments of the decade. It occurred partly in response to government efforts to enhance the power of unions, but it was also a result of the increased pressure from American workers and their leaders.
The growing labor militancy first became obvious in 1934, when recently organized workers (many of them inspired by the collective bargaining provisions of the National Industrial Recovery Act) demonstrated a new assertiveness. It was soon clear, however, that without stronger legal protection, most organizing drives would end in frustration. Once the Wagner Act became law, the search for more-effective forms of organization rapidly gained strength in labor ranks.
The American Federation of Labor (AFL) remained committed to the idea of the craft union: organizing workers on the basis of their skills. But that concept had little to offer unskilled laborers, who now constituted the bulk of the industrial work-
Industrial f°rce- During the 1930s, therefore, a newer
Unionism concept of labor organization challenged the craft union ideal: industrial unionism.
Advocates of this approach argued that all workers in a particular industry should be organized in a single union, regardless of what functions the workers performed: all autoworkers should be in a single automobile union; all steelworkers should be in a single steel union. United in this way, workers would greatly increase their power.
Leaders of the AFL craft unions for the most part opposed the new concept. But industrial unionism found a number of important advocates, most prominent among them John L. Lewis, the talented, flamboyant, and eloquent leader of the United Mine Workers. At first, Lewis and his allies attempted to work within the AFL, but friction between the new industrial organizations Lewis was promoting and the older craft unions grew rapidly. At the 1935 AFL convention, Lewis became embroiled in a series of angry confrontations (and one celebrated fistfight) with craft union leaders before finally walking out. A few weeks later, he created the Committee on Industrial Organization. When the AFL expelled the new committee and all the industrial unions it represented, Lewis renamed the committee the Congress of Industrial Organizations (CIO), established
it in 1936 as an organization directly rivaling the AFL, and became its first president.
The CIO expanded the constituency of the labor movement. It was more receptive to women and to blacks than the AFL had been, in part because women and blacks were more likely to be relegated to unskilled jobs and in part because CIO organizing drives targeted previously unorganized industries (textiles, laundries, tobacco factories, and others) where women and minorities constituted much of the workforce. The CIO was also a more militant organization than the AFL. by the time of the 1936 schism, it was already engaged in major organizing battles in the automobile and steel industries.
CIO
Organizing Battles
Out of several competing auto unions, the United Auto Workers (UAW) was gradually emerging preeminent in the early and mid-1930s. But although it was gaining recruits, it was making little
Sit Down progress in winning recognition from the Strike	automobile corporations. In December 1936,
however, autoworkers employed a controversial and effective new technique for challenging corporate opposition: the sit-down strike. Employees in several General Motors plants in Detroit simply sat down inside the plants, refusing either to work or to leave, thus preventing the company from using strikebreakers. The tactic spread to other locations, and by February 1937 strikers had occupied seventeen GM plants. While male workers remained in the factories, female supporters-relatives, friends, and coworkers of the strikers-demonstrated on behalf of the strikers, lobbied on their behalf with state and local officials, and provided food, clothing, and other necessities to the men inside. The strikers ignored court orders and local police efforts to force them to vacate the buildings. When Michigan’s governor, Frank Murphy, a liberal Democrat, refused to call up the National Guard to clear out the strikers, and when the federal government also refused to intervene on behalf of employers, General Motors relented. In February 1937, GM became the first major manufacturer to recognize the UAW; other automobile companies soon did the same. The sit-down strike proved effective for rubber workers and others as well, but it survived only briefly as a labor technique. Its apparent illegality aroused so
much public opposition that labor leaders soon abandoned it.
In the steel industry, the battle for unionization was less easily won. In 1936, the Steel Workers’ Organizing Committee (SWOC; later the United Steelworkers of America) began a major organizing drive involving thousands of workers and frequent, at times bitter, strikes. In March 1937, U.S. Steel, the giant of the industry, recognized the union rather than risk a costly strike at a time when it sensed itself on the verge of recovery from the Depression. But the smaller companies (known collectively as "Little Steel”) were less accommodating. On Memorial Day 1937, a group of striking workers from Republic Steel gathered with their families for a picnic and demonstration in South Chicago. When they attempted to march peacefully (and legally) toward the steel plant, police opened fire on them. Ten demonstrators were killed; another ninety were wounded. Despite a public outcry against the "Memorial Day Massacre,” the harsh tactics of Little Steel companies succeeded. The 1937 strike failed.
But the victory of Little Steel was one of the last gasps of the kind of brutal strikebreaking that had proved so effective in the past. In 1937 alone, there were 4,720 strikes-over 80 percent of them settled in favor of the unions. By the end of the year, more than 8 million workers were members of
LaboiXrapid unions recognized as official bargaining
Growth units bY employers (compared with 3 million in 1932). By 1941, that number had expanded to 10 million and included the workers of Little Steel,
whose employers had finally recognized the SWOC.
672 * CHAPTER 24
THE “MEMORIAL DAY MASSACRE”
The bitterness of the labor struggles of the 1930s was nowhere more evident than in Chicago in 1937, when striking workers attempting to march on a Republic Steel plant were brutally attacked by Chicago police, who used clubs, tear gas, and guns to turn the marchers away. Ten strikers were killed and many others were injured. (© Carl Linde/AP Images) Social Security
In 1935, Roosevelt gave public support to what became the Social Security Act, which Congress passed the same year. It established several distinct programs. For the elderly, there were two types of assistance. Those who were presently destitute could receive up to $15 a month in federal assistance. More important for the future, many Americans presently working were incorporated into a pension system, to which they and their employers would contribute by paying a payroll tax; it would provide them with an income on retirement. Pension payments would not begin until 1942 and even then would provide only $10 to $85 a month to recipients. And broad categories of workers (including domestic servants and agricultural laborers, occupations with disproportionate numbers of blacks and women) were excluded from the program. But the act was a crucial first
step in building the nation's most important social program for the elderly.
In addition, the Social Security Act created a system of unemployment insurance, which employers alone would finance Unemployment and which made ic possible for workers Insurance laid off from their jobs to receive temporary government assistance. It also established a limited system (later expanded) of federal aid to people
with disabilities and a program of aid to dependent children.
The framers of the Social Security Act wanted to create a system of "insurance,” not "welfare.” And the largest programs (old-age pensions and unemployment insurance) were in many ways similar to private insurance programs, with contributions from participants and benefits available to all. But the act also provided considerable direct assistance based on need-to the elderly poor, to those with disabilities, to dependent children and their mothers. These groups were widely
THE NEW DEAL
« 673 perceived to be small and genuinely unable to support themselves. But in later generations the programs for these groups would expand considerably.
New Directions in Relief
Social Security was designed primarily to fulfill long-range goals. But millions of unemployed Americans had immediate needs. To help them, the Roosevelt administration established the
WPA
Works Progress Administration (WPA) in 1935. Like the Civil Works Administration and earlier efforts, the WPA established a system of work relief for the unemployed. But it was much bigger than the earlier agencies, both in the size of its budget ($5 billion in its first two
years) and in the energy and imagination of its operations.
Under the direction of Harry Hopkins, the WPA was
responsible for building or renovating 110,000 public buildings (schools, post offices, government office buildings) and for
WHO IS ELIGIBLE-
• EVERYBODY working for salary or wages ('WITH ONLY A FEW EXCEPTIONS. SUCH AS AGRICULTURE, DO^T»C SERVICE^ AND GOVERNMENT WORK) applications for social security A^uNTjp^EyEARv^ ABLE IHROUGH EMPLOYERS IF YOU DO NOT GET ONE FROM YOUR EMPLOYER. ASK TOR ONE AT THE POST OFFICE HOW TO RETURN APPLICATION
DO II NUW. I’*'-'
.. \J( iUil Jicuzitij !)(d zd
IFORMATION AT*ANYB
POn^OFFKE constructing almost 600 airports, more than 500,000 miles of roads, and over 100,000 bridges. In the process, the WPA kept an average of 2.1 million workers employed and pumped needed money into the economy.
The WPA displayed flexibility and imagination in offering assistance to those whose occupations did not fit into any traditional category of relief. The Federal Writers’ Project of the WPA, for example, gave unemployed writers a chance to do their work and receive a government salary. The Federal Arts Project, similarly, helped painters, sculptors, and others to continue their careers. The Federal Music Project and the Federal Theater Project oversaw the production of concerts and plays, creating work for unemployed musicians, actors, and directors. Other relief agencies emerged alongside the WPA. The National Youth Administration (NYA) provided work and scholarship assistance to high-school and college-age men and women. The Emergency Housing Division of the Public Works Administration began federal sponsorship of public housing.
Men and women alike were in distress in the 1930s (as in all difficult times). But the new welfare system dealt with members of the two sexes in very different ways. For men, the government concentrated mainly on work relief-on such programs as the CCC, the CWA, and the WPA, all of which were overwhelmingly male, and-through the Social Security Act-pensions and unemployment insurance, both structured initially to assist mostly men. The principal government aid to women was not work relief but cash assistance-most notably through the Aid to Dependent Children program of Social Security, which was designed largely to assist single mothers. This disparity in treatment reflected a widespread assumption that men constituted the bulk of the paid workforce and that women needed to be treated within the context of the family. In fact, millions of women were already employed by the 1930s.
The 1936 "Referendum"
For a time in 1935 there had seemed reason to question the president’s prospects for reelection. But by the middle of 1936-with the economy visibly reviving-there could be
Alf Landon	doubt that he would win a second
term. The Republican Party nominated the moderate governor of Kansas, Alf M. Landon, who waged a weak campaign. Roosevelt’s dissident challengers now appeared powerless. One reason was the violent death of their most effective leader, Huey Long, who was assassinated in Louisiana in September 1935. Another reason was the ill-fated alliance among Father Coughlin, Dr. Townsend, and Gerald L. K. Smith (an intemperate henchman of Huey Long), who joined forces that summer to establish a new political movement-the Union Party, which nominated an undistinguished North Dakota congressman, William
Lemke, for president.
The result was the greatest landslide in American history to that point. Roosevelt polled just under 61 percent of the
SECURITY POSTER, 1935
Within months of the passage of the Social irity Act of 1935, the new Social Security Board began publicizing the benefits the new
im offered to working Americans-the most dramatic of which was a monthly pension to
ed Americans who had paid into the system. (The Library of Congress)
674 * CHAPTER 24
Significant
events
Declining
unemployment
1,000,000 Unemployed totals for entire labor force
UNEMPLOYMENT, 1920-1945 This chart shows the shifting patterns of unemployment from 1920 to the end of World War II. As it reveals, nonfarm unemployment was very high in the early 1920s, in the last year of the postwar recession, but remained relatively low from 1923 to 1929. The beginning of the Great Depression sent unemployment soaring—to a peak of nearly 13 million people in early 1933—an unemployment rate of 25 percent. The New Deal helped create a partial recovery from the Depression over the next four years, but unemployment remained very high throughout the 1930s, and spiked sharply higher again during the recession of 1937-1938, before falling rapidly after war began in Europe.
• Why was the war so much more successful than the New Deal in ending unemployment?
WPA WORKERS ON THE JOB
The Works Progress Administration funded an enormous variety of work projects to provide jobs for the unemployed. But most WPA employees worked on construction sites of one kind or another. (© Jospeh Schwartz/ Corbis) THE NEW DEAL * 675
WPA MURAL ART
The Federal Arts Project of the Works Progress Administration commissioned an impressive series of public murals from the artists it employed. Many of these murals adorned post offices, libraries, and other public buildings constructed by the WPA. Shown here is a portion of a mural of shipbuilders at the Rincon Center, San Francisco. This mural is unusual in showing an African American worker. Most WPA iconography portrayed workers as white men only. (© Architec Tour/Alamy) vote to Landon’s 36 percent and carried every state except Maine and Vermont. The Democrats increased their already large majorities in both houses of Congress. The Union Party received fewer than 900,000 votes.
The election results demonstrated the party realignment
Electoral rhat ^ew ^eal had produced. The
Realignment Democrats now controlled a broad coalition of western and southern farmers, the urban working classes, the poor and unemployed, and the black communities of northern cities, as well as traditional progressives and committed new liberals-a coalition that constituted a substantial majority of the electorate. It would be decades before the Republican Party could again create a last-
ing majority coalition of its own.
THE NEW DEAL IN DISARRAY
Roosevelt emerged from the 1936 election at the zenith of his popularity. Within months, however, the New Deal was mired in serious new difficulties-a result of continuing opposition, the president’s own political errors, and major economic setbacks.
The Court Fight
The 1936 mandate, Franklin Roosevelt believed, made it possible for him to do something about the problem of the Supreme Court. No program of reform, he had become convinced, could long survive the conservative justices, who had already struck hown the NRA and the AAA and threatened to invalidate even more legislation.
In February 1937, Roosevelt sent a surprise message to
Capitol Hill proposing a general overhaul of the federal
c°urt system; included among the many provisions was one
to add up to six new justices to the Supreme Court, with a new justice added for every sitting justice over the age of
Court	seventy. The courts were "overworked,”
Packing he claimed, and needed additional manpower and fresh ideas to enable them to cope with their increasing burdens. But Roosevelt’s real purpose was to give himself the opportunity to appoint new, liberal justices and change the ideological balance of
the Court.
Conservatives were outraged at the "Court-packing plan,” and even many Roosevelt supporters were disturbed by what they considered evidence of the president’s hunger for power. Still, Roosevelt might well have persuaded Congress to approve at least a compromise measure had not the Supreme Court itself intervened. Of the nine justices, three reliably supported the New Deal, and four reliably opposed it. Of the remaining two, Chief Justice Charles Evans Hughes often sided with the progressives and Associate Justice Owen J. Roberts usually voted with the conservatives. On March 29, 1937, Roberts, Hughes, and the three progressive justices voted together to uphold a state minimum-wage law-in the case of West Coast Hotel u. Parrishthus appearing to reverse a 5-to-4 decision of the previous year invalidating a similar law. Two weeks later, again by a 5-to-4 margin, the Court upheld the Wagner Act, and in May it validated the Social Security Act. Whether or not for that reason, the Court’s newly moderate position made the Courtpacking bill seem unnecessary. Congress ultimately defeated it.
On one level, the affair was a significant victory for Franklin Roosevelt. The Court was no longer an obstacle to New Deal reforms, particularly after the older justices began to retire, to be replaced by Roosevelt appointees. But the Court-packing episode did lasting political damage to the administration. From 1937 on, southern Democrats and other conservatives voted against Roosevelt’s measures much more often than they had in the past.
1
The Golden Age of Comic Books
SUPERMAN
The most popular action figure in the history of comic books was Superman, whose superhuman powers were particularly appealing fantasies to Americans suffering through the Depression and, later, World War II. (© Hulton Archive/Getty Images) the troubled years of the Great Depression and World War II, many Americans sought release from their anxieties in fantasy. Movies, plays, books, radio shows, and other diversions drew people out of their own lives and into a safer or more glamorous or more exciting world. Beginning in 1938, one of the most popular forms of escape for many young Americans became the
comic book.
In February 1935, Malcolm Wheeler-Nicholson founded the first comics magazine—what we now know as the "comic book"—titled New Fun. New Fun was not successful, but Wheeler founded a new company, Detective Comics, and began in 1937 to design a new magazine called Action Comics. Wheeler ran out of money before he could publish anything, but the company continued without him. In 1938, the first issue of Action Comics appeared with a startling and controversial cover—a powerful man in a skintight suit lifting a car over his head. His name was Superman, and he became the most popular cartoon character of all time.
Within a year, Superman had a comic book named after him, which was selling over 1.2 million copies each issue. By 1940, there was a popular Superman radio show introduced by a breathless announcer crying, "It’s a bird! It's a plane! It's... Superman!" Soon other publishers began developing new "superheroes" (a term invented by the creators of Superman) to capitalize on this growing new popular appetite. In 1939, a second great comic book publisher appeared—Marvel Comics. By the early
1940s, Superman had been joined by other superheroes: the Human Torch, the Sub-Mariner, Batman, the Flash, and Wonder Woman, a character created in part to signal the importance of women to the war effort.
It is not hard to imagine why superheroes would be so appealing to Americans—particularly to the teenage boys who were the largest single purchasers of comic books—in the 1930s and 1940s. Superman and other superheroes were idealized versions of the ideal boy—smart, good, "the perfect Boy Scout," as one fan put it. But they were also all-powerful, capable of righting wrong and preventing catastrophe. At a time when catastrophe was an ever-present possibility in the world, superheroes were a comforting escape from fear.
Many of the early comic book writers were young Jewish men, conscious of their outsider status in an American culture not yet wholly open to them. Almost all the characters they created had alter egos, identities they used while living within the normal world. Superman was Clark Kent, a "mild-mannered reporter." Batman was Bruce Wayne, a wealthy heir, The superhero characters were outsiders themselves—but outsiders endowed with special powers and abilities unavailable to ordinary people.
Even before America entered World War II, the comic superheroes were battling the Axis powers, Marvel's the Human Torch and the Sub-Mariner joined forces against the German navy. Superman fought spies and saboteurs at home. Captain America, a new character created in March 1941, was a frail young man rejected by the army who, after being given a secret serum by a military doctor, became extraordinarily powerful. The cover of the first issue of Captain America showed the title character punching Hitler in his headquarters in Germany.
The end of the war was also the end of this first "golden age" of American comic books. Many superhero magazines ceased publication as peacetime reduced the popular appetite for fantasy. In their place emerged new comic books, which emphasized romance and even mild sexuality.
In the late 1940s and early 1950s, comic books began to come under attack from educators, psychiatrists, journalists, and even the federal government. Congress took no legal action against comic book publishers or writers, but the comic book industry itself created a trade association, which produced a "Comics Code" to prevent indecency in the industry.
Comic books experienced an unexpected revival in the late 1950s and 1960s. Old superheroes—Captain America, the Human Torch, and others—reappeared, New ones—Spiderman, Iron Man, the Silver Surfer-joined them. Superman, who had never disappeared, enjoyed newfound popularity and became the hero for a time of a popular television show. But these new or
showed similar advances. Roosevelt seized on these improvements as an excuse to try to balance the federal budget, convinced by Treasury Secretary Henry Morgenthau and many economists that the real danger now was no longer depression but inflation. Between January and August 1937,
Retrenchment and Recession
By the summer of 1937, the gross national product, which
had dropped from $82 billion in 1929 to $40 billion in 1932,
had risen back to nearly $72 billion. Other economic indices
676
SUPERMAN TODAY
Superman continues to appeal to the fantasies of Americans, as shown by this poster of the movie Superman Returns from 2006. Another film, Man of Steel, was released in 2013. And yet another is in the works for 2015 or 2016. (© Warner Bros./Photofest) revised heroes were not entirely like those of the 1930s and 1940s. They reflected the realities °f an increasingly complex and complicated world, which their characters like their mostly young readers—were struggling to understand. •
UNDERSTAND. ANALYZE. AND
EVADJ/vr What could comic books offer readers suffering through the crisis of the Great Depression?
How and why have comic book superheroes changed over time?
What might account for the upsurge in comic books' popularity in the late 1950s and 1960s?
conditions were soon almost as bad as they had been in the bleak days of 1932-1933.
The recession of 1937, known to the president’s critics as the "Roosevelt recession,” was a result of many factors. But to many observers at the time (including, apparently, the
he cut the WPA in half, laying off 1.5 million relief workers.
A few weeks later, the fragile boom collapsed. Other cuts
in spending followed. The index of industrial production
dropped from 117 in August 1937 to 76 in May 1938.
F°ur million additional workers lost their jobs. Economic
677,
1
678 * CHAPTER 24
Federal Budget and Surplus/Deficit, 1920-1940
Gross National Product, 1920-1940
100
%	90	j	j
=	80	U
2	70	)
§5 60 f——^+———
g 30 I	j
g 20 (———X—~
m 10
0 l|8li|IBi i 1,^
1920	1925	1930	1935	1940
Budget and Surplus/Deficit as Percentage of GNP, 1920-1940
president himself), it seemed to be a direct result of the
_	T administration’s unwise decision to reduce
Recession spending. And so m April 1938, the president asked Congress for an emergency appropriation of $5 billion for public works and relief programs, and government funds soon began pouring into the economy once again. Within a few months, another tentative recovery seemed to be under way, and the advocates of spending pointed to it as proof of the validity of their
approach.
At about the same time, at the urging of a group of younger, antimonopolist liberals in the administration, Roosevelt sent a stinging message to Congress, vehemently denouncing what he called an "unjustifiable concentration of economic power” and asking for the creation of a commission to consider major reforms in the antitrust laws. In response, Congress established the Temporary National Economic Committee (TNEC), whose members included representatives of both houses of Congress and officials from several executive agencies. Also that spring, Roosevelt appointed a new head of the antitrust division of the Justice Department: Thurman Arnold, a Yale Law School professor who soon proved to be the most vigorous director ever to serve in that office.
Later in 1938, the administration successfully supported one of its most ambitious pieces of labor legislation, the Fair Labor Standards Act, which for the first time established a national minimum wage and a forty-hour workweek, and which also placed strict limits on child labor. Like Social Security, the act at first excluded from its provisions the great majority of women and minority workers.
Despite these achievements, however, by the end of 1938 the New Deal had essentially come to an end. Congressional opposition now made it difficult for the president to enact any major new programs. But more important, perhaps, the threat End of the	wor^ crisis hung heavy in the political
New Deal atmosphere, and Roosevelt was gradually growing more concerned with persuading a reluctant nation to prepare for war than with pursuing new
avenues of reform.
1920	1925	1930	1935	1940
FEDERAL BUDGET SURPLUS/DEFICIT AND GNP, 1920-1940
Among its many other effects, the Great Depression produced dramatic changes in the fiscal condition of the federal government. In the first of these three charts, note the sharp decline in federal spending in the early 1920s (as the nation demobilized from World War I) and the appearance of significant budget surpluses. Note, too, the dramatic increase in government spending (and the appearance of significant deficits) once the Depression began and, particularly, once Franklin Roosevelt became president. The second chart illustrates the varying fortunes of the nation's economy by showing the rise and fall of gross national product—the total of goods and services produced by the economy. The GNP fell sharply in the first years of the Depression, but by the end of the 1930s was nearing its 1929 levels again. The final chart gives some perspective on these figures by illustrating the relationship between federal spending (and federal surpluses and deficits) and the total size of the economy. At its peak in these years, federal spending was never more than about 9 percent of the GNP and the deficit never more than about 5 percent. In recent decades, the federal budget has often exceeded 20 percent of the GNP. Deficits—much higher in absolute numbers than those of the 1930s—were rarely higher as a percentage of the GNP than those of the 1930s until the first decade of the twenty-first century. ® Why did government deficits increase so sharply during the Great Depression?
LIMITS AND LEGACIES
OF THE NEW DEAL
In the 1930s, Roosevelt's principal critics were conservatives, who accused him of abandoning the Constitution and establishing a menacing, even tyrannical, state. In later years, the New Deal’s most visible critics attacked it from the left, pointing to the major problems it left unsolved and the important groups it failed to represent. And beginning in the early twenty-first century, conservative attacks on the New Deal would emerge again. A full understanding of the New Deal requires coming to terms with the sources of both critiques, by examining both its achievements and its limits.
THE NEW DEAL - 679
i
The Idea of the "Broker State"
In 1933, many New Dealers dreamed of using their new popularity and authority to remake American capitalism-to produce new forms of cooperation and control that would create a genuinely harmonious, ordered economic world. By 1939, it was clear that what they had created was in fact something quite different. But rather than bemoan the gap between their original intentions and their ultimate achievements, New Deal liberals, both in 1939 and in later years, chose to accept what they had produced and to celebrate it-to use it as a model for future reform efforts.
What they had created was something that in later years would become known as the "broker state/’ Instead of forging all elements of society into a single,
Fqtari khmfwt	°
OF THE
"Broker harmonious unit, as some reformers had State”	once hoped to do, the real achievement
of the New Deal was to elevate and strengthen new interest groups so as to allow them to compete more effectively in the national marketplace. The New Deal made the federal government a mediator in that continuous competition-a force that could intervene when necessary to help some groups and limit the power of others. In 1933, there had been only one great interest group (albeit a varied and divided one) with genuine power in the national economy: the corporate world. By the end of the 1930s, American business found itself competing for influence with an increasingly powerful labor movement, an organized agricultural economy, and aroused consumers. In later years, the "broker state” idea would expand to embrace other groups as well: racial, ethnic, and religious minorities;
women; and many others. Thus, one of the enduring legacies of the New Deal was to make the federal government a protector of interest groups and a supervisor of the competition among them, rather than an instrument attempting to create a universal harmony of interests.
What determines which interest groups receive government assistance in a "broker state”? The experience of the New Deal suggests that such assistance goes largely to those groups able to exercise enough political or economic power to demand it. Thus in the 1930s, farmers-after decades of organization and agitation-and workers-as the result of militant action and mass mobilization-won from the government new and important protections. Other groups, less well organized, perhaps, but politically important because so numerous and visible, won limited assistance as well: imperiled homeowners, the unemployed, the elderly.
By the same token, the interest-group democracy that the New Deal came to represent offered much less to those groups either too weak to demand assistance or not visible enough to arouse widespread public support. And yet those same groups were often the ones most in need of help from their government. One of the important limits of the New Deal, therefore, was its very modest record on behalf of several important social groups.
African Americans and the New Deal
One group the New Deal did relatively little to assist was African Americans. The administration was not hostile to black aspirations. On the contrary, the New Deal was probably more sympathetic to them than any previous government of the
ELEANOR ROOSEVELT
First Lady Eleanor Roosevelt was among the first women to play an important role in politics and government. She oversaw Franklin Roosevelt’s political campaigns before he became president as well as developed an important career of her own working on social programs in New York. When she moved to the White House, she served her husband by traveling widely (something that Franklin Roosevelt, whose legs were paralyzed by polio, could not often do), and she took on issues that her husband chose not to embrace. An example is this photograph of Eleanor Roosevelt riding in a car to a Washington, D.C., jail to inspect the facility, which had a reputation for being overcrowded and obsolete. (© Underwood & Underwood/Corbis) 
DEBATING THE PAST
The New Deal
T7 ni T3 many years< debate among historians over the nature of the New Deal mirrored the * U H debate among Americans in the 1930s over the achievements of the Roosevelt administration. Historians struggled, just as contemporaries had done, to decide whether the New Deal was a good thing or a bad thing.
By far the dominant view of the New Deal among scholars has been an approving, liberal interpretation, and the first important voice of that view was Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr., who argued in the three volumes of The Age of Roosevelt (1957-1960) that the New Deal marked a continuation of the long struggle between public power and private interests. Roosevelt had moved that struggle to a new level, challenging the unrestrained power of the business community and offering far more protection for workers, farmers, consumers, and others than they had enjoyed in the past.
The first systematic "revisionist" interpretation of the New Deal came in 1963, in William Leuchtenburg's Franklin D. Roosevelt and the New Deal. Leuchtenburg was a sympathetic critic, arguing that most of the limitations of the New Deal were a result of the restrictions imposed on Roosevelt by the political and ideological realities of his time—that the New Deal probably could not have done much more than it did. Nevertheless, Leuchtenburg could not agree with others who called the New Deal a revolution in social policy. He was able to muster only enough enthusiasm to call it a "halfway revolution," one that enhanced the positions of some previously disadvantaged groups (notably farmers and factory workers) but did little or nothing for many others (including blacks, sharecroppers, and the urban poor). Ellis Hawley augmented these moderate criticisms of the Roosevelt record in The New Deal and the Problem of Monopoly (1966). In examining 1930s economic policies, Hawley argued that New Deal efforts were in many cases designed to enhance the position of private entrepreneurs—even, at times, at the expense of some of the liberal reform goals that administration officials espoused.
Much harsher criticisms of the New Deal emerged in the 1960s and later. Barton Bernstein in a 1968 essay concluded that the Roosevelt administration may have saved capitalism, but it failed to help—and in many ways actually harmed—groups most in need of assistance. Ronald Radosh, Thomas Ferguson, and, more recently, Colin Gordon took such arguments further. They cited the close ties between the New Deal and internationalist financiers and industrialists; the liberalism of the 1930s was a product of their shared interest in protecting capitalists and stabilizing capitalism.
Most scholars in the 1980s and 1990s, however, seemed largely to have accepted the revised liberal view: that the New Deal was a significant (and, most agreed, valuable) chapter in the history of reform, but one that worked within rigid, occasionally crippling limits. Much of the recent work on the New Deal has focused on the constraints within which it was operating. The sociologist Theda Skocpol (along with other scholars) has emphasized the issue of "state capacity" as an important New Deal constraint; ambitious reform ideas often foundered, she argued, because no government bureaucracy had sufficient strength and expertise to shape or administer them. James T. Patterson, Barry Karl, Mark Leff, and others have emphasized the political constraints the New Deal encountered. Both in Congress and among the public, conservative inhibitions about government remained strong.
Frank Freidel, Ellis Hawley, Herbert Stein, and many others point as well to the ideological constraints affecting Franklin Roosevelt and his supporters. Alan Brinkley, in The End of Reform (1995), described an ideological shift in New Deal liberalism that shifted from the initial regulatory view of government to one that envisioned relatively little direct governmental interference in the corporate world and centered instead on Keynesian welfare state programs. David Kennedy, in Freedom from Fear (1999), argued by contrast that the aggressive anticapitalism of early New Deal liberalism actually hampered the search for recovery. Only when Roosevelt
twentieth century. Eleanor Roosevelt spoke throughout the 1930s on behalf of racial justice and put continuing pressure on her husband and others in the federal government to ease discrimination against blacks. She was also partially responsible for what was, symbolically at least, one of the most important events of the decade for African Americans. When the renowned African American concert singer Marian Anderson was refused permission in the spring of 1939 to give a concert in the auditorium of the Daughters of the American Revolution (Washington’s only major concert hall), Eleanor Roosevelt resigned from the organization and then (along with Interior Secretary Harold Ickes, another champion of racial equality) helped secure government permission for her to sing on the steps of the Lincoln Memorial. Anderson’s Easter Sunday concert attracted 75,000 people and became, in effect, one of the first modern civil rights demonstrations.
The president himself appointed a number of black officials to significant second-level positions in his administration. Roosevelt appointees such as Robert Weaver, William Hastie, and Mary McLeod Bethune created an informal network of "Black	officeholders who consulted frequently
Cabinet” with one another and who became known us the uBlack Cabinet.” Eleanor Roosevelt,
Harold Ickes, and Harry Hopkins all made efforts to ensure that New Deal relief programs did not exclude blacks; and by 1935, perhaps a quarter of all African Americans were receiving some form of government assistance. One result was a historic change in black electoral behavior. As late as 1932, most African Americans were voting Republican, as they had since the Civil War. By 1936, more than 90 percent of them were voting Democratic-the beginnings of a political alliance that would endure for decades.
680
FDR IN ALBANY
Before he became president, Franklin Roosevelt served as governor of New York, where he developed a reputation of being an activist working to confront the Great Depression. In this 1930 photograph, he is sitting at his desk in the state capitol. Two years later, he would be elected president. (© AFP/Getty Images) embraced measures that unleashed the power of the market did prosperity begin to return.
The phrase "New Deal liberalism" has come in the postwar era to seem synonymous with modern ideas of aggressive federal management of the economy, elaborate welfare systems, a powerful bureaucracy, and large-scale government spending. Many historians of the New Deal, however, would argue that the modern idea of "New Deal liberalism" bears only a limited relationship to the ideas that New Dealers themselves embraced. The liberal accomplishments of the 1930s can be understood only in the context of their own time; later liberal efforts drew from that legacy but also altered it to fit the needs and assumptions of very different eras. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	What is the conservative view of the New Deal?
2.	How did the political atmosphere of the 1930s limit the New Deal?
3.	Did the New Deal save capitalism? If so, how and why?
African Americans supported Franklin Roosevelt because they knew he was not their enemy. But they had few illusions that the New Deal represented a major turning point in American race relations. For example, the president was never willing to risk losing the backing of southern Democrats by supporting legislation to make lynching a federal crime. Nor would he endorse efforts in Congress to ban the poll tax, one of the most potent tools by which white southerners kept blacks from voting.
New Deal relief agencies did not challenge, and indeed reinforced, existing patterns of discrimination. The Civilian Conservation Corps established separate black camps. The NRA codes tolerated paying blacks less than whites doing the same jobs. African Americans were largely
excluded from employment in the TVA. The Federal Housing Administration refused to provide mortgages to African
Existing
Discrimination
Reinforced
Americans moving into white neighborhoods, and the first public housing projects financed by the federal government were racially segregated. The WPA routinely relegated black, Hispanic, and Asian workers to the least-skilled and lowest-paying jobs, or excluded them altogether; when funding ebbed, nonwhites, like women, were among the first to be dismissed.
The New Deal was not hostile to African Americans, and it did much to help them advance. But it refused to make the issue of race a significant part of its agenda.
The New Deal and the "Indian Problem"
In many respects, government policies toward the Indian tribes in the 1930s were simply a continuation of the long-established effort to encourage Native Americans to assimilate
Indian
Reorganization
Act
682 * CHAPTER 24
But the principal elements of federal policy in the New Deal years worked to advance a very different
John Collier	§oa1’ lar§elV because of the efforts of
the extraordinary commissioner of Indian affairs in those years, John Collier. Collier was a former social worker who had become committed to the cause of the Indians after exposure to tribal cultures in New Mexico in the 1920s. More important, he was greatly influenced by the work of twentieth-century anthropologists who promoted the idea of cultural relativism, which challenged the three-centuries-old assumption among white Americans that Indians were "savages” and that white society was inherently superior and more ^civilized?
Collier promoted legislation that would, he hoped, reverse the pressures on Native Americans to assimilate and would allow them the right to live in traditional Indian ways. Not all tribal leaders agreed with Collier; indeed, his belief in the importance of preserving Indian culture would not find its broadest support among the tribes
until the 1960s. Nevertheless, Collier effectively promoted legislation-which became the Indian Reorganization Act of 1934-that restored to the tribes the right to own land collectively. (It reversed the allotment policy adopted in 1887, which encouraged the breaking up of tribal lands into individually
owned plots-a policy that had led to the loss of over 90 million acres of tribal land to white speculators and others.) In the thirteen years after passage of the 1934 bill, tribal land increased by nearly 4 million acres, and Indian agricultural income increased from under $2 million in 1934 to over $49 million in 1947.
Even with the redistribution of lands under the 1934 act, however, Indians continued to possess, for the most part, only territory whites did not want-much of it arid, some of it desert. And as a group, they continued to constitute the poorest segment of the population. The efforts of the 1930s did not solve what some white people called the "Indian problem/’ They did, however, provide Indians with some tools for rebuilding the viability of the tribes.
Women ano the New Deal
As with African Americans, the New Deal was not hostile to feminist aspirations, but neither did it do a great deal to advance them. That was largely because such aspirations did not have sufficiently widespread support (even among women) to make it politically advantageous for the administration to back them.
There were, to be sure, important symbolic gestures on behalf of women. Roosevelt appointed the first female cabinet member in the nation’s history, Secretary of Labor Frances Perkins. He also named more than 100 other women to positions at lower levels of the federal bureaucracy. They created an active female network within the government and cooperated
HARLEM, THE “NEGRO CAPITAL OF AMERICA”
Photographer Jack Manning took this picture, Street Portrait 5 Young Bogs, as part of Aaron Siskind’s project called the "Harlem Document,” which portrayed life in what Look magazine called "the Negro capital of America." This photo was taken in 1938 or 1939. (Jack Manning/© The New York Times/Redux) with one another in advancing causes of interest to women.
Symbolic Such appointments were in part a response
Gains for to pressure from Eleanor Roosevelt, who
Women	was a committed advocate of women’s rights
and a champion of humanitarian causes.
Molly Dewson, head of the Women’s Division of the Democratic National Committee, was also influential in securing federal appointments for women as well as in increasing their role within the Democratic Party. Several women received appointments to the federal Judiciary. And one, Hattie Caraway of Arkansas, became in 1934 the first woman elected to a full term in the U.S. Senate. (She was running to succeed her husband, who had died in office.)
But New Deal support for women operated within limits, partly because New Deal women themselves had limited views of what their aims should be. Frances Perkins and many others in the administration emerged out of the feminist tradition of the progressive era, which emphasized not so much gender equality as special protections for women. Perkins and other women reformers were instrumental in creating support for, and shaping the character of, the Social Security Act of 1935. But they built into that bill their own notion of women s special place in a male-dominated economy. The principal provision of the bill specifically designed for women-the Aid to Dependent Children program-was modeled on the state-level mothers’ pensions that generations of progressive women had worked to pass earlier in the century.
THE NEW DEAL * 683
The New Deal generally supported the prevailing belief that in hard times women should withdraw from the work-
Prevailing place to open up more jobs for men. New
Gender Norms	Deal relief agencies offered relatively
Buttressed	little employment for women. The NRA
sanctioned wage practices that discriminated against women. The Social Security program at first excluded domestic servants, waitresses, and other predomi-
nantly female occupations.
The New Deal in the West and the South
Two regions of the United States that did receive special attention from the New Deal were the West and the South, both of which benefited disproportionately from New Deal relief and public works programs. The West received more federal funds per capita through New Deal relief programs than any other region, and parts of the South were not far behind.
Most westerners were eager for the assistance New Deal agencies provided, but their political leaders were not always as supportive. In Colorado, for example, the state legislature refused to provide the required matching funds for FERA relief in 1933. When, in response, Harry Hopkins cut Colorado off from the program, unemployed people rioted in Denver and looted food stores. Only then did the legislature reverse course and provide funding.
In the South, locally administered New Deal relief programs did not challenge prevailing racial norms. In the West, too, New Deal programs accepted existing racial and ethnic prejudices. In several states, relief agencies paid different groups at different rates: white Anglos received the most generous aid; blacks, Indians, and Mexican Americans received lower levels
Failure to of suPPort- In the CCC camps in New
Challenge Mexico, Hispanics and Anglos sometimes
Jim Crow worked in the same camps, but there were frequent tensions and occasional conflicts between them. But the main reason for the New Deal’s impact on the West was that conditions in the region made the government’s programs especially important. Federal agricultural programs had an enormous impact on the West because farming remained so much more central to the economy of the region than it did in much of the East. The largest New Deal public works programs—the great dams and power stations— were mainly in the West, both because the best locations for such facilities were there and because the West had the most need for new sources of water and power. The Grand Coulee Dam on the Columbia River was the largest public works project in American history to that point. It provided cheap electric power for much of the Northwest and, along with the construction of smaller dams and water projects nearby, cre-
ated a basis for economic development in the region.
Without this enormous public investment by the federal
government, much of the economic development that trans-
formed the West after World War II would have been much
more difficult, if not impossible, to achieve. But the region paid
New Deal’s
Legacy in the West
a price for the government’s beneficence: for generations after the Great Depression, the federal government maintained a much greater and more visible bureaucratic presence in the West than in any other region.
The New Deal located fewer great infrastructure projects in the South than it did in the West-although the largest of them, the TVA, was an entirely southern venture. But many of the economic development efforts the Roosevelt administration undertook were of disproportionate benefit to the South, largely because the South was the least economically developed region of the nation in the 1930s. One example was rural electrification, which had a large impact on many agrarian areas of the nation but a particular impact on the South, where vast parts of the countryside remained without access to power lines until the Rural Electrification Administration provided them.
The New Deal also directed national attention toward the economic condition of the South in a way that no previous administration had done. Many Americans outside the South had long believed the South to be "backward,” but they tended to attribute that backwardness to racism, segregation, and prejudice. In a 1938 economic report sponsored by the federal government, a group of social scientists and others called the South "the nation’s number one economic problem.” Although the report made some reference to the South’s racial customs, it spoke mostly about its lack of sufficiently developed economic institutions and facilities.
Failure to Achieve Recovery
The New Deal and the
National Economy
The most frequent criticisms of the New Deal involve its failure genuinely to revive or reform the American economy. New Dealers never fully embraced government spending as a vehicle for recovery, and their efforts along other lines never succeeded in ending the Depression. The economic boom sparked by World War II, not the New Deal, finally ended the crisis. Nor did the New Deal substantially alter the distribution of power within American capitalism;
and it had only a small impact on the distribution of wealth among the American people.
Nevertheless, the New Deal did have important and lasting effects on both the behavior and the structure of the American economy. It helped elevate new groups-workers, farmers, and others-to positions from which they could at times effectively challenge the power of the corporations. It contributed to the economic development of the West and, to a lesser degree, the South. It increased the regulatory functions of the federal government in ways that helped stabilize previously troubled areas of the economy: the stock market, the banking system, and others. (Many of these regulations were weakened or repealed beginning in the 1970s and beyond.) And the administration helped establish the basis for new forms of federal fiscal policy, which in the postwar years would give the government tools for promoting and regulating economic growth.
684 « CHAPTER 24
MAJOR LEGISLATION OF THE NEW DEAL
1933	Emergency Banking Act Economy Act
Civilian Conservation Corps Agricultural Adjustment Act Tennessee Valley Authority National Industrial Recovery Act Banking Act
Federal Emergency Relief Act Home Owners Refinancing Act Civil Works Administration Federal Securities Act
1934	National Housing Act Securities and Exchange Act Home Owners Loan Act
1935	Works Progress Administration National Youth Administration Social Security Act
National Labor Relations Act Public Utilities Holding Company Act Resettlement Administration Rural Electrification Administration Revenue Act ("wealth tax”)
1936	Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act
1937	Farm Security Administration National Housing Act
1938	Second Agricultural Adjustment Act Fair Labor Standards Act
1939	Executive Reorganization Act
Federal Welfare State Established
The New Deal also created the basis of the federal welfare state, through its many relief programs and above all through the Social Security system. The conservative inhibitions New Dealers brought to this task ensured that the welfare system would be limited in its impact (at least in
comparison with those of other industrial nations), would reinforce some traditional patterns of gender and racial discrimination, and would be expensive and cumbersome to administer. But for all its limits, the new system marked a historic break with the federal government’s traditional reluctance to offer public assistance to its neediest citizens.
The New Deal and American Politics
Perhaps the most dramatic effect of the New Deal was on the structure and behavior of American government and on the character of American politics. Franklin Roosevelt helped enhance the power of the federal government. By the end of
the 1930s, state and local governments were clearly of secondary importance to the government in Washington. Roosevelt also established the presidency as the preeminent center of authority within the federal government.
Finally, the New Deal had a profound impact on how the American people defined themselves politically. It took a New	weak, divided Democratic Party, which
Expectations of ^ad been a minority force in American Government politics for many decades, and turned it into a mighty coalition that would dominate national party competition for more than thirty years.
It turned the attention of many voters away from some of the cultural issues that had preoccupied them in the 1920s and awakened in them an interest in economic matters of direct importance to their lives. And it created among the American people greatly increased expectations of government-expectations that the New Deal did not always fulfill but that survived to become the basis of new liberal crusades in the postwar era.
LOOKING BACK
The New Deal was the most dramatic and important moment in the modern history of American government. From the time of Franklin Roosevelt’s inauguration in 1933 to the beginning of World War II eight years later, the federal government engaged in a broad and diverse series of experiments designed to relieve the distress of unemployment and poverty, to reform the economy to prevent future crises, and to bring the Great Depression to an end. It had only partial success in all those efforts.
Unemployment and poverty remained high throughout the
New Deal, although many federal programs provided assistance
to millions of people who would otherwise have had none. The
structure of the American economy remained essentially the same as it had been in earlier years, although there were by the end of the New Deal some important new regulatory agencies in Washington—and an important new role for organized labor, enforced by a new federal law. Nothing the New Deal did ended the Great Depression, but some of its policies kept it from getting worse-and some of them pointed the way toward more effective economic policies in the future.
Perhaps the most important legacy of the New Deal was the creation of a sense of possibilities among many Americans, to persuade them that the fortunes of individuals need not be left entirely to chance or to the workings of the market. Many
Americans emerged from the 1930s convinced that individu-
als deserved some protections from the unpredictability and
instability of the modern economy, and that the New Deal-for
all its limitations-had demonstrated the value of enlisting gov-
ernment in the effort to provide those protections.
THE NEW DEAL 685
SIGNIFICANT EVENTS
Key Terms/ People/ Places/ Events
Agricultural Adjustment Act (AAA) 663
"Bank holiday” 662 Broker state 679 Charles E. Coughlin 669 Congress of Industrial
Organizations (CIO) 671
Court-packing plan 675 Eleanor Roosevelt 680 Frances Perkins 682 Francis E. Townsend 669 Harry Hopkins 673 Huey Long 670
RECALL AND REFLECT
1.	What New Deal programs were aimed at agricultural and industrial recovery, and what was the effect of the programs in both areas?
2.	What criticisms did critics on both the right and the left level at the New Deal? How did FDR and his administration respond to these criticisms?
3.	What gains did organized labor make during the 1930s? How did labor achieve these gains?
4.	How did New Deal programs treat minorities-African Americans, Hispanic Americans, and Native Americans?
5.	What was the impact of the New Deal on women?
6.	How did the New Deal affect the western United States?
John Collier 682 John L. Lewis 671 Marian Anderson 680 National Recovery
Administration
(NRA) 666
Second New Deal 670 Securities and Exchange
Commission (SEC) 668 Sit-down strike 671 Social Security Act 672 Tennessee Valley
Authority (TVA) 667
1933
"First New Deal” legislation enacted (see p. 662) Franklin Roosevelt inaugurated
Twenty-First Amendment ends prohibition with repeal of Eighteenth Amendment
Dr. Francis Townsend begins campaign for old-age pensions
1934
Conservatives create American Liberty League
Indian Reorganization Act passed
Huey Long establishes Share-Our-Wealth Society
1935
Father Charles Coughlin establishes National Union for Social Justice
John L. Lewis and allies break with AFL Huey Long assassinated Supreme Court invalidates NRA
"Second New Deal" legislation passed
1936
CIO established Sit-down strikes begin
Supreme Court invalidates Agricultural Adjustment Act
1937
Roosevelt proposes "Court-packing plan" Supreme Court validates Wagner Act
Severe recession begins

1938
Fair Labor Standards Act enacted, establishes national minimum wage
1939
Marian Anderson sings at Lincoln Memorial
THE GLOBAL CRISIS, 1921-1941
MADRID”
The Spanish Civil War, in which the forces led by Francisco Franco overturned the existing republican government, was an early signal to many Americans of the dangers of fascism and the threat to democracy. Although the United States government remained aloof from the conflict, several thousand Americans volunteered to fight on behalf of the republican forces. This 1938 Spanish war poster contains the words "Defending Madrid Is Defending Catalonia," an effort by the government in Madrid to enlist the support of the surrounding regions to defend the capital against Franco forces. (© Archive Photos/Getty Images) □EFENSAR MADRID
LOOKING AHEAD
1.	What are some of the views that Americans expressed as the world crises of the 1930s expanded?
2.	How did the economic crisis of the worldwide Great Depression help create new political orders in many nations?
3.	What was the sequence of events between 1939 and 1941 that brought the United States into military involvement in World War II?
SETTING THE STAGE
REPUBLICAN SENATOR HENRY CABOT LODGE OF MASSACHUSETTS,
chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, led the fight against ratification of the Treaty of Versailles in 1918 and 1919. In part because of his efforts, the Senate defeated the treaty; the United States failed to join the League of Nations; and American foreign policy embarked on an independent course that for the next two decades would attempt, but ultimately fail, to expand American influence and maintain international stability without committing the United States to any lasting relationships with other nations.
Lodge was not an isolationist. He believed the United States should exert its influence internationally. But he believed, too, that the United States should remain unfettered by obligations to anyone else. He said in 1919:
We are a great moral asset of Christian civilization. . . . How did we get there? By our own efforts. Nobody led us, nobody guided us, nobody controlled us.... I would keep America as she has been—not isolated, not prevent her from joining other nations for . . . great purposes—but I wish her to be master of her own fate.
Lodge was not alone in voicing such sentiments. Throughout the 1920s, those controlling American foreign policy attempted to increase Americas role in the world while keeping the nation free of commitments that might limit its own freedom of action. In the end, the cautious, limited American internationalism of the interwar years proved insufficient to protect the interests of the United States, to create global stability, or to keep the nation from becoming involved in the greatest war in human history.
THE DIPLOMACY OF THE NEW ERA
Critics of American foreign policy in the 1920s often used a single word to describe the cause of their disenchantment: isolationism. Having rejected the Wilsonian vision of a new world order,
Myth of	they c^aime^ the nation had turned its back on the rest of the globe and repu-
Isolationism	diated its international responsibilities. In fact, the United States played a more
active role in world affairs in the 1920s than it had at almost any previous time
in its history-even if not the role the Wilsonians had prescribed.
Replacing the League
It was clear when the Harding administration took office in 1921 that American membership in the League of Nations was no longer a realistic possibility. As if finally to bury the issue, Secretary of State Charles Evans Hughes secured legislation from Congress in 1921 declaring the war with Germany at an end, and then proceeded to negotiate separate peace treaties with the former Central Powers. Through these treaties, American policymakers believed, the United States would receive all the advantages of the Versailles Treaty with none of the burdensome responsibilities. But Hughes was also committed to finding something to replace the League as a guarantor of world peace and stability. He embarked, therefore, on a series of efforts to build safeguards against future wars-but safeguards that would not hamper American freedom of action in the world.
The most important such effort was the Washington Conference of 1921-an attempt to prevent what was threatening to become a costly and destabilizing naval armaments race between the United States, Britain, and Japan. In his opening speech, Hughes startled the delegates by proposing a plan for dramatic reductions in the fleets of all three nations and a ten-year moratorium on the construction of large warships. He called for the scrapping of nearly 2 million tons of existing shipping. Far more surprising than the proposal was the fact that the conference ultimately agreed to accept
most of its terms, something that Hughes apparently had not anticipated. The Five-Power Pact of February 1922 established both limits for total naval tonnage and a ratio of armaments among the signatories For every 5 tons of American and British warships, Japan would maintain 3 and France and Italy 1 75 each. (Although the treaty seemed to confirm the military inferiority of Japan, in fact
Washington Conference of 1921
687
